Utah statutes.
4-39-304.   Marking domesticated elk.

(1)  Each domesticated elk, not previously tattooed, shall be marked by either a tattoo, as provided in Subsection (2), or by a microchip, as provided in Subsection (3):

(a)  within 30 days of a change of ownership; or

(b)  in the case of newborn calves, within 15 days after being weaned, but in any case, no later than September 15.

(2)  If a domesticated elk is identified with a tattoo, the tattoo shall:

(a)  be placed peri-anally or inside the right ear; and

(b)  consist of a four-digit herd number assigned by the department over a three-digit individual animal number assigned by the owner.

(3)  If a domesticated elk is identified with a microchip, it shall be placed in the right ear.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

